Utah statutes.
73-2-29.   Agreement with another state -- Regulation, distribution, and administration of interstate water.

(1)  The state engineer, after receiving approval from the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources and the governor, may enter into an agreement with another state to regulate, distribute, and administer the water from an interstate surface water source that is not otherwise subject to an interstate compact.

(2)  The state engineer may coordinate with another state to implement:

(a)  the terms of an agreement entered into according to Subsection (1); and

(b)  an interstate compact that regulates, distributes, or administers an interstate surface water source.



Enacted by Chapter 67, 2008 General Session

